Georgia statutes. 
Grants for Public Purposes Based upon Road Mileage.

36-17-1. Legislative purpose and intent.

36-17-2. Computation of individual county grants.

36-17-3. Disbursement and expenditure of funds.

Article 2

Grants to Counties for County Roads and Maintenance.

36-17-20. Authorization of grants.

36-17-21. Allocation of funds; grant of tax credit to homesteads as prerequisite to receipt of funds; use of surplus funds.

36-17-22. Allocation of funds; grant of credit on certain tangible property taxes as prerequisite to receipt of funds.

36-17-23. Limits on granting of credits; claim and certification of credits by taxpayer; recovery of credits erroneously or illegally granted; payment of tax liability prerequisite to credit.

36-17-24. Credits and surplus to be shown on tax bills; disbursal of funds on certification of state revenue commissioner.

36-17-25. Administration of article by state revenue commissioner; promulgation of rules and regulations.

Annotations

Cross references. - Grants by state to county and municipal hospital authorities, § 31-7-94.

——————————

ARTICLE 1

GRANTS FOR PUBLIC PURPOSES BASED UPON ROAD MILEAGE

36-17-1. Legislative purpose and intent.

Statute text

It is declared to be the purpose and intent of the General Assembly that state funds be made available to the governing authorities of the counties of this state to be expended for any public purposes.

History

(Ga. L. 1967, p. 888, § 1.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 81A C.J.S., States, § 404 et seq.

36-17-2. Computation of individual county grants.

Statute text

To the extent that funds are made available by the budget authorities pursuant to the general appropriations Acts or any other laws for the purposes set out in Code Section 36-17-1, except for the grants to counties which are appropriated as a part of the appropriation to the Department of Transportation designated "For grants to counties for aid in county road construction and maintenance," the Office of the State Treasurer is authorized and directed to grant such funds to the counties of this state in the same proportion which the total public road mileage of each county bears to the total public road mileage in the state, as such mileage information is furnished by the Department of Transportation. The computation of individual county grants, as provided for in this Code section, shall be prepared and certified by the state treasurer, who shall make such payments.

History

(Ga. L. 1967, p. 888, § 2; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, §§ 2, 3/SB 296.)

Annotations

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Use of funds for social security. - Appropriated grant moneys allocated to a county under the authority of this section may be withheld by the Department of Administrative Services and released to the Employees' Retirement System of Georgia to protect the system from delinquent social security reports and remittances for which the county is liable. 1975 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 75-65.

36-17-3. Disbursement and expenditure of funds.

Statute text

Funds distributed under this article by the Office of the State Treasurer shall be paid to the counties in the name of the county treasurer or other fiscal authority authorized to receive county funds. Such funds shall be expended by the county only for the purposes prescribed in Code Section 36-17-1.

History

(Ga. L. 1967, p. 888, § 3; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 2/SB 296.)

——————————

ARTICLE 2

GRANTS TO COUNTIES FOR COUNTY ROADS AND MAINTENANCE

Annotations

Cross references. - Schedule of amounts of money to be appropriated to counties for use exclusively for construction and maintenance of public roads, § 48-14-3.

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Constitutionality of Ga. L. 1973, p. 475. - Georgia Laws 1973, p. 475, which authorized the grant of state funds "to aid in the construction of county roads and maintenance thereof," to the counties of the state, upon each county's providing a property tax credit in accordance with formulas prescribed in the Act, was a constitutionally permissible legislative grant, and did not violate the due process or equal protection provisions of the Constitution of Georgia or the United States. Brown v. Wright, 231 Ga. 686, 203 S.E.2d 487 (1974).

Provision in Ga. L. 1973, p. 475 that no county was eligible to receive any funds unless a tax credit was given on homesteads first and then on tangible property (exclusive of motor vehicles and trailers), in accordance with the formulas prescribed in the Act, was not a forbidden gratuity within the meaning of the Georgia Constitution. Brown v. Wright, 231 Ga. 686, 203 S.E.2d 487 (1974).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 81A C.J.S., States, § 404 et seq.

36-17-20. Authorization of grants.

Statute text

Pursuant to the authority granted to the General Assembly in Article III, Section IX, Paragraph II(c) of the Constitution of Georgia and in order to provide for a more effective management and fiscal administration of the state and pursuant to Article III, Section IX, Paragraph VI(b) of the Constitution of Georgia, in order to provide funds to counties to aid in the construction and maintenance of county roads and, in addition to funds provided pursuant to other laws, there may be allotted to each county annually for county road construction and maintenance certain grants as provided in Code Sections 36-17-21 and 36-17-22.

History

(Ga. L. 1973, p. 475, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1079, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 57; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 36.)

36-17-21. Allocation of funds; grant of tax credit to homesteads as prerequisite to receipt of funds; use of surplus funds.

Statute text

(a) In any year in which the General Assembly appropriates by line item, and with reference to this Code section, funds necessary to provide grants to counties to aid in the construction and maintenance of county roads, such grants shall be allotted to each county pro rata according to each county's share of the total number of homesteads in the state for the immediately preceding year. For purposes of this Code section and Code Section 36-17-22, the term "homestead" shall mean and include all that tangible property upon which an ad valorem property tax homestead exemption was claimed and allowed.

(b) In order to provide better fiscal management, the funds provided pursuant to this Code section are intended to be utilized for the relief of ad valorem taxation on tangible property. No county shall be entitled to receive any of the funds provided for in this Code section unless and until a credit against county ad valorem property taxes levied and expended by the county governing authority is granted by the governing authority of the county to each homestead located within the county. Each credit shall equal an amount computed as follows: the amount of the grant allotted, pursuant to this Code section, to the county to aid in the construction and maintenance of county roads, divided by the number of homesteads in the county.

(c) No credit granted pursuant to this Code section shall exceed one-half of the credit recipient's total tax liability for county ad valorem property taxes levied and expended by the county governing authority.

(d) If a surplus remains from the funds allotted to such county by this Code section after complying with this Code section, such remaining funds shall be deemed appropriated and allotted to the county under Code Section 36-17-22.

History

(Ga. L. 1973, p. 475, § 3; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1079, § 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 36.)

36-17-22. Allocation of funds; grant of credit on certain tangible property taxes as prerequisite to receipt of funds.

Statute text

(a) In any year in which the General Assembly appropriates by line item, and with reference to this Code section, funds necessary to provide grants to counties to aid in the construction and maintenance of county roads, such grants shall be allotted to each county pro rata according to each county's share of the total number of homesteads in the state for the immediately preceding year.

(b) In order to provide better fiscal management, the funds provided pursuant to this Code section are intended to be utilized for the relief of ad valorem taxation on tangible property. No county shall be entitled to receive any of the funds provided for in this Code section unless and until a credit against county ad valorem property taxes levied and expended by the county governing authority is granted by the governing authority of the county to all eligible tangible property, as defined in subsection (c) of this Code section, except motor vehicles and trailers, located within the county. Each credit shall equal an amount computed as follows: a pro rata share of the sum of the grant allotted, pursuant to this Code section, to the county to aid in the construction and maintenance of county roads and the surplus, if any, from the funds allotted to such county by subsection (a) of Code Section 36-17-21, after compliance by the county with the provisions of subsection (b) of Code Section 36-17-21.

(c) As used in this Code section, the term "eligible tangible property" means all tangible property except that tangible property required to be returned to and assessed by the state revenue commissioner pursuant to statutes passed by the General Assembly under the authority of Article VII, Section I, Paragraph III of the Constitution of Georgia.

History

(Ga. L. 1975, p. 1079, § 3; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 36.)

36-17-23. Limits on granting of credits; claim and certification of credits by taxpayer; recovery of credits erroneously or illegally granted; payment of tax liability prerequisite to credit.

Statute text

(a) No credit or combination of credits granted pursuant to this article shall exceed the lesser of (1) $1,000.00 or (2) the credit recipient's total tax liability for county ad valorem property taxes levied and expended by the county governing authority. No credit authorized by such Code sections shall be granted unless the taxpayer claims his entitlement to such credit and certifies that the sum of all such credits so claimed by him does not exceed $1,000.00. The state revenue commissioner shall provide by regulation for the forms and procedures by which taxpayers shall claim credits and certify the sum thereof. The governing authorities of the various counties shall make available to the taxing authorities of such counties funds sufficient to defray the administrative costs of this article. Any person who, with intent to receive credit not authorized by this article, claims a credit to which he is not lawfully entitled or falsely certifies the sum of credits claimed by him shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. Any credit erroneously or illegally granted, whether due to negligence or any other cause, shall be recoverable by the county granting such credit in the same fashion as any other delinquent property tax.

(b) No credit authorized under this article shall be granted to any taxpayer unless the taxpayer pays his then current tax liability for county ad valorem property taxes levied and expended by the county governing authority on or before the date such liability becomes due. However, in order to comply with this subsection, the governing authority of any county may, by appropriate resolution, extend the date that such tax liability becomes due.

History

(Ga. L. 1975, p. 1079, § 4.)

36-17-24. Credits and surplus to be shown on tax bills; disbursal of funds on certification of state revenue commissioner.

Statute text

The taxing authority of each county receiving funds pursuant to this article shall show in a prominent manner on the tax bill of each ad valorem taxpayer the dollar amount of credit against ad valorem property taxes which the taxpayer is receiving as a result of the funds allocated and shall show that such credit is a result of the passage of such Code sections by the General Assembly. Each such tax bill shall also show in a prominent manner the amount of any surplus, from the funds allotted to the county by such Code sections, after compliance by the county with subsection (b) of Code Section 36-17-21 and subsection (b) of Code Section 36-17-22, retained by the governing authority of the county. The form of the notice shall be as prescribed by the state revenue commissioner, who shall determine and certify to the appropriate state fiscal officer the amount of funds to which each county is entitled pursuant to this article. The determination of the state revenue commissioner shall be final and the appropriate state fiscal officer shall disburse the funds pursuant to the certification.

History

(Ga. L. 1973, p. 475, § 4; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1079, § 5.)

36-17-25. Administration of article by state revenue commissioner; promulgation of rules and regulations.

Statute text

It shall be the duty of the state revenue commissioner to administer this article. The commissioner shall have the authority to promulgate such rules and regulations as he may deem necessary for the effective administration of this article.

History

(Ga. L. 1975, p. 1079, § 6.)

——————————

CHAPTER 18

REGULATION OF CABLE TELEVISION SYSTEMS

Sec.

36-18-1. "Cable television system" defined.

36-18-2. Powers of governing authorities.

36-18-3. Restriction on authority of counties and municipalities to regulate.

36-18-4. Intent and construction of chapter.

36-18-5. Applicability of chapter.

Annotations

Cross references. - Theft of telecommunication services, § 46-5-2 et seq.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

ALR. - Validity and construction of provision of Cable Communications Policy Act (47 USC § 541(a)(2)) allowing cable companies access to utility easements on private property, 113 A.L.R. Fed. 523.

36-18-1. "Cable television system" defined.

Statute text

As used in this chapter, the term "cable television system" means a nonbroadcast facility consisting of a set of transmission paths and associated generation, reception, transmission, and control equipment, under common ownership and control, that distributes or is designed to distribute to subscribers the signals of one or more television broadcast stations and programs received via satellite, microwave, video tape, or video discs or produced by the franchised cable system.

History

(Ga. L. 1981, p. 865, § 1.)

36-18-2. Powers of governing authorities.

Statute text

The governing authority of each county in this state is authorized to limit the operation of cable television systems within its territorial limits, except as limited by Code Section 36-18-3, to operators licensed and franchised by the county; to grant, in its sole discretion, one or more franchise licenses for the operation of cable television systems within the territorial limits of that county, except as limited by Code Section 36-18-3; and to regulate by ordinance or resolution the operation of cable television systems licensed and franchised by that county. The governing authority of each such county, in connection with the grant of such franchises, is further authorized to charge franchise fees to cable television systems for the right to operate the systems within the unincorporated areas of the county and within any incorporated areas which are subject to the limitation contained in Code Section 36-18-3. Cable television system franchise fees shall be negotiated between each county and each franchisee, in an amount not to exceed that amount authorized under applicable federal law and regulations.

History

(Ga. L. 1981, p. 865, § 2.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Taxation of special franchises, § 48-5-420 et seq.

Law reviews. - For article surveying developments in Georgia local government law from mid-1980 through mid-1981, see 33 Mercer L. Rev. 187 (1981).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

No authorization of municipalities. - O.C.G.A. § 36-18-2 confers authority only upon the governing authority of each county in the state, and there is no similar authorization of municipalities. Cable Holdings of Battlefield, Inc. v. Lookout Cable Servs., Inc., 178 Ga. App. 456, 343 S.E.2d 737 (1986).

Cited in Cable Holdings of Battlefield, Inc. v. Cooke, 764 F.2d 1466 (11th Cir. 1985).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 36 Am. Jur. 2d, Franchises from Public Entities, §§ 36, 37.

C.J.S. - 37 C.J.S., Franchises, §§ 26, 27.

ALR. - Validity and construction of municipal ordinances regulating community antenna television service (CATV), 41 A.L.R.3d 384.

Standing to contest award of, or acquisition of right to operate, cable TV certificate, license, or franchise in state court action, 78 A.L.R.3d 1255.

36-18-3. Restriction on authority of counties and municipalities to regulate.

Statute text

A county shall neither grant a franchise nor collect a franchise fee for the operation of cable television systems within the corporate limits of any municipality except by agreement with the municipality. A municipality shall neither grant a franchise nor collect a franchise fee for the operation of cable television systems within the unincorporated area of a county except by agreement with the county.

History

(Ga. L. 1981, p. 865, § 3.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article surveying developments in Georgia local government law from mid-1980 through mid-1981, see 33 Mercer L. Rev. 187 (1981).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 36 Am. Jur. 2d, Franchises from Public Entities, §§ 36, 37.

C.J.S. - 37 C.J.S., Franchises, §§ 26, 27.

36-18-4. Intent and construction of chapter.

Statute text

It is the intent of this chapter to confirm expressly the authority of counties to grant franchises for, and to regulate by ordinance or resolution, cable television systems within their territorial limits, except as limited by Code Section 36-18-3. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to impair any cable television system franchise license lawfully issued by a county or municipality prior to April 9, 1981; and any such license shall be entitled to the benefits of this chapter.

History

(Ga. L. 1981, p. 865, § 4.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Pre-1981 franchises which were not lawfully issued, as the franchises purported to be "exclusive," were not entitled to the benefits bestowed by O.C.G.A. Ch. 18, T. 36. Cable Holdings of Battlefield, Inc. v. Lookout Cable Servs., Inc., 178 Ga. App. 456, 343 S.E.2d 737 (1986).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 36 Am. Jur. 2d, Franchises from Public Entities, §§ 36, 37.

C.J.S. - 37 C.J.S., Franchises, §§ 26, 27.

36-18-5. Applicability of chapter.

Statute text

This chapter shall not apply to any cable television system owned or operated by a city, a county, or a school system as to operations within the geographical area of such city, county, or school system.

History

(Ga. L. 1981, p. 865, § 5; Ga. L. 2004, p. 990, § 1.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 36 Am. Jur. 2d, Franchises from Public Entities, §§ 36, 37.

C.J.S. - 37 C.J.S., Franchises, §§ 26, 27.

——————————

CHAPTER 19

IMMUNITY FROM ANTITRUST LIABILITY

36-19-1 and 36-19-2. Redesignated.

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Chapter 19 of Title 36 and §§ 36-19-1 and 36-19-2, relating to immunity from antitrust liability, were redesignated as Chapter 65 of Title 36 and §§ 36-65-1 and 36-65-2, respectively, by Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 36.

——————————

CHAPTER 20

COUNTY LEADERSHIP TRAINING

Sec.

36-20-1. Short title.

36-20-2. Legislative findings and intent.

36-20-3. Definitions.

36-20-4. Training of elected members of county governing authority.

36-20-5. Georgia County Leadership Academy.

36-20-6. Board supervision of Georgia County Leadership Academy.

36-20-7. Membership of board.

36-20-8. Acceptance by board of federal, state, or local appropriations, grants, or contributions; authority to enter into contracts, leases, or agreements.

36-20-9. Report on accomplishments of academy.

Annotations

Law reviews. - For annual survey on local government law, see 42 Mercer L. Rev. 359 (1990).

36-20-1. Short title.

Statute text

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Georgia County Leadership Act."

History

(Code 1981, § 36-20-1, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1642, § 1.)

36-20-2. Legislative findings and intent.

Statute text

The General Assembly finds and declares that it is in the best interests of the citizens of this state to require newly elected members of a county governing authority, prior to taking office, to attend a course of training and education on matters pertaining to the administration and operation of county government. The purpose of such course shall be to instruct such individuals in the powers, duties, and responsibilities of their positions of public trust.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-20-2, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1642, § 1.)

36-20-3. Definitions.

Statute text

As used in this chapter, the term:

(1) "Academy" means the Georgia County Leadership Academy.

(2) "Board" means the Board of the Georgia County Leadership Academy.

(3) "County governing authority" means the governing authority as defined in paragraph (7) of Code Section 1-3-3 and an elected chief executive officer of a county.

(4) "State" means the State of Georgia and any department, board, bureau, commission, or other agency thereof.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-20-3, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1642, § 1.)

36-20-4. Training of elected members of county governing authority.

Statute text

(a) All persons elected as members of a county governing authority who were not serving as members of a county governing authority on July 1, 1990, shall enroll in, attend, and satisfactorily complete a course of training and education of at least 18 hours on matters pertaining to the administration and operations of county governments. Such course of training and education shall include, but not be limited to, orientation in local government finance and budgeting; methods of taxation; planning; public works and utilities; parks and recreation; environmental management; public safety, health, and welfare; personnel management; responsiveness to the community; the ethics, duties, and responsibilities of members of a county governing authority or a chief executive officer; and such other matters as may be deemed necessary and appropriate by the academy.

(b) All expenses incurred by a newly elected member of a county governing authority related to the course of training and education authorized and required by subsection (a) of this Code section, including the reasonable costs of housing, travel, and meals, shall be paid from public funds appropriated for such purposes. All expenses not paid for by state funds shall be paid from county funds by the county governing authority whose newly elected member or members shall attend such course.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-20-4, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1642, § 1.)

36-20-5. Georgia County Leadership Academy.

Statute text

(a) There is created and established the Georgia County Leadership Academy. Except as otherwise provided in Code Section 36-20-4, all costs of operating and conducting the academy shall be paid for from public funds appropriated for such purposes.

(b) The academy shall have the power, duty, and authority to design, implement, and administer the course of training and education required by Code Section 36-20-4.

(c) The initial course of training and education required by Code Section 36-20-4 shall be conducted by the academy on the Tuesday after the first Monday in November of 1990 and completed before January 1, 1991. Subsequent courses shall be conducted by the academy biennially between the Tuesday after the first Monday in November and before January 1 of the following year or as otherwise changed by general law. The academy shall have sole responsibility for determining the exact date or dates the course of training and education shall be conducted.

(d) The academy shall establish guidelines and procedures to permit any person elected or appointed as a member of a county governing authority after January 1 of a calendar year or any person who is unable to attend or complete the course of training and education when offered by the academy due to medical disability, providential cause, or any other reason deemed sufficient by the academy, to comply with the requirements of Code Section 36-20-4.

(e) The academy shall perform such other duties and have such other powers and authority as may be necessary and proper or as prescribed by general law.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-20-5, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1642, § 1.)

36-20-6. Board supervision of Georgia County Leadership Academy.

Statute text

(a) The academy shall be under the direction and supervision of the board of the Georgia County Leadership Academy. The board shall have the power and duty to organize, administer, control, oversee, and advise the academy so that the academy is operated in accordance with the provisions of this article.

(b) The academy is assigned to the Department of Community Affairs for administrative purposes only, as prescribed in Code Section 50-4-3.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-20-6, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1642, § 1.)

36-20-7. Membership of board.

Statute text

The board shall consist of seven members and shall be composed of the commissioner of the Department of Community Affairs, the director of the Carl Vinson Institute of Government of the University of Georgia, the administrator of Governmental Training of the Carl Vinson Institute of Government of the University of Georgia, the president of the Association County Commissioners of Georgia, the executive director of the Association County Commissioners of Georgia, and two members appointed by the Governor. Members of the board appointed by the Governor shall serve for four-year terms.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-20-7, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1642, § 1.)

36-20-8. Acceptance by board of federal, state, or local appropriations, grants, or contributions; authority to enter into contracts, leases, or agreements.

Statute text

(a) The board may accept appropriations, grants, gifts, donations, or contributions from the federal government; the state government; any county, municipal, or local government; any board, bureau, commission, agency, or establishment of any such government; any other organization, firm, or corporation, public or private; and any individual or groups of individuals in furtherance of the services, purposes, duties, responsibilities, or functions vested in the board and academy.

(b) The board is authorized to make such contracts, leases, or agreements as may be necessary and convenient to carry out the duties and purposes for which the board is created. The board is authorized to enter into contracts, leases, or agreements with any person, firm, or corporation, public or private, upon such terms and for such purposes as may be deemed advisable by the board.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-20-8, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1642, § 1.)

36-20-9. Report on accomplishments of academy.

Statute text

On or before February 1 of each year, the director of the Carl Vinson Institute of Government, on behalf of the board, shall make a report to the Governor, the chairman of the Senate State and Local Governmental Operations Committee, and the chairman of the State Planning and Community Affairs Committee of the House of Representatives. The report shall include a summary of the accomplishments of the academy during the preceding calendar year, including, but not limited to, the total number of members of a county governing authority who attended the course of training and education offered by the academy; an outline of the academy's programs for the current calendar year; an evaluation of the programs and services offered by the academy; and recommendations, if any, for legislation as may be necessary to improve the programs and services offered by the academy.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-20-9, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 10, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 36.)

——————————

CHAPTER 21

GROUP HEALTH BENEFITS PROGRAM

Sec.

36-21-1. Legislative intent.

36-21-2. Definitions.

36-21-3. Corporation governed by a board of directors; powers, duties, and operations; bond; administrative expenses.

36-21-4. Annual audits.

36-21-5. Establishment of benefit plans.

36-21-6. Investment of funds.

36-21-7. Funds not subject to process, levy, or attachment; nonassignability.

36-21-8. Chapter exempt from regulation under Title 33.

36-21-9. Tax-exempt status.

36-21-10. State debt not created.

Annotations

Cross references. - Health care plans, T. 33, C. 20.

36-21-1. Legislative intent.

Statute text

It is declared to be the intent of the General Assembly that a method be provided whereby counties and certain other entities of this state may, in the discretion of their respective governing bodies, provide group health and other employee benefits to their employees through a common administrative and investment system. Such a system based on joint participation will permit counties and other entities, regardless of size, to provide certain benefits to their employees, will reduce overall administrative costs which might be prohibitive if undertaken individually, and will make possible better investment opportunities. It is intended that this chapter be liberally construed to effectuate this intent.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-21-1, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 1190, § 1.)

36-21-2. Definitions.

Statute text

As used in this chapter, the term:

(1) "Benefit system" or "system" means the plan or plans of employee benefits offered and administered pursuant to this chapter.

(2) "Board" means the board of directors of the ACCG Group Health Benefits Program, Inc.

(3) "Contract" means a contract executed pursuant to this chapter between the board and a county.

(4) "Corporation" means the ACCG Group Health Benefits Program, Inc., a corporation established under Chapter 3 of Title 14, the "Georgia Nonprofit Corporation Code," created to provide benefits pursuant to this chapter.

(5) "County" means the group health benefits program operated by the corporation; the Association County Commissioners of Georgia and any affiliate; any Georgia county government; any consolidated city-county government; or any public authority, commission, board, or similar body created or activated by an Act of the General Assembly or by resolution or ordinance of the county governing authority, individually or jointly with any other political subdivision or subdivisions of the State of Georgia, pursuant to the Constitution or an Act of the General Assembly and which carries out its function on a county-wide basis, a multicounty basis, or wholly within the unincorporated area of a county.

(6) "Employee" means any salaried or hourly rated person employed by a county. Notwithstanding any laws to the contrary, the term also includes any appointed or elected member of the governing authority of a county, the chief legal officer and any associate legal officer, and any other elected or appointed county official.

(7) "Employee benefits" means group health benefits, group short-term disability benefits, group death benefits, group accidental death and dismemberment benefits, and such other benefits as from time to time the board may deem advisable.

(8) "Member county" means a county which has contracted to become a member of the benefit system as provided for in this chapter.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-21-2, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 1190, § 1.)

36-21-3. Corporation governed by a board of directors; powers, duties, and operations; bond; administrative expenses.

Statute text

(a) Any county in this state may enter into a contract with the board for the purpose of providing employee benefits to its employees.

(b) The corporation shall be governed by a board of directors, which shall be appointed and shall serve in accordance with the bylaws of the corporation. The board shall be authorized to operate and administer the benefit system in accordance with its bylaws and such other rules and regulations as may be established by the board as necessary or desirable for the administration of the benefit system.

(c) The board shall maintain a fidelity bond, and errors and omissions coverage or other appropriate liability insurance, in an amount deemed sufficient by the board.

(d) The administrative expenses of the board, including all operational expenses, fees, compensation, and other costs, shall be paid from funds held by it and may be chargeable by it to either principal or income or both, as determined by it, as of any valuation date. Further, the board shall have the authority to allocate expenses among member counties on the basis of costs.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-21-3, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 1190, § 1.)

36-21-4. Annual audits.

Statute text

The benefit system authorized under this chapter shall have an annual audit of its books and accounts performed by a certified public accountant. Such audit shall be conducted in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. A copy of such audit shall be made available to member counties.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-21-4, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 1190, § 1.)

36-21-5. Establishment of benefit plans.

Statute text

(a) (1) The board has the power to establish one or more plans which may be adopted by any county that meets the criteria established by the board. The employees to be covered, the benefits to be provided, and the terms and conditions for benefits shall be provided in the plan. A county is empowered to adopt such a plan by ordinance and to execute an agreement with the board to provide employee benefits as provided in the plan. The agreement and plan entered into by each member county may constitute a separate plan, unless the contract between the board and one or more counties specifically provides that funds of the counties are to be pooled and treated as a single plan. A plan providing employee benefits may provide for the method of funding such benefits through the use of insurance, self-funding, or otherwise.

(2) Any agreement between the board and a county which provides for self-funded benefits shall contain a provision that such benefits are to be provided, to the extent fixed in the plan, by the county and that the corporation does not guarantee the benefits.

(b) The board is authorized to specify in the plan reasonable employee classifications.

(c) Counties are authorized to appropriate funds to provide the benefits specified in such plan and to pay their portion of the administrative costs of the board in administering the system. Each county is authorized to pay the total contribution on behalf of its employees or to provide that a portion be deducted from the salaries of participating employees.

(d) Contributions paid by a county shall be paid from county funds which are on hand or which will be collected in the year the contribution is made and shall not be deemed to create a debt of the county.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-21-5, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 1190, § 1.)

36-21-6. Investment of funds.

Statute text

The board is authorized to invest and reinvest funds held by it, in accordance with the bylaws of the corporation, in any investments which are legal investments for domestic insurance companies under the laws of this state or in any investments authorized for trustees of private employee benefit plans by the federal Employees Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-21-6, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 1190, § 1.)

36-21-7. Funds not subject to process, levy, or attachment; nonassignability.

Statute text

Funds held by the board of trustees or for its account shall not be subject to process, levy, or attachment; nor shall benefits arising under this chapter or any contract pursuant to this chapter be assignable unless otherwise specifically permitted under the plan of benefits.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-21-7, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 1190, § 1.)

36-21-8. Chapter exempt from regulation under Title 33.

Statute text

The provision of employee benefits pursuant to this chapter shall not be subject to regulation under Title 33.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-21-8, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 1190, § 1.)

36-21-9. Tax-exempt status.

Statute text

The employee benefit system shall be exempt from state and local taxes and fees.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-21-9, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 1190, § 1.)

36-21-10. State debt not created.

Statute text

Nothing in this chapter shall create a debt of the State of Georgia.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-21-10, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 1190, § 1.)

——————————

CHAPTER 22

LAND CONSERVATION

36-22-1 through 36-22-15. Redesignated.

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Code Sections 36-22-1 through 36-22-4 and Code Sections 36-22-8 through 36-22-15, relating to land conservation, were redesignated as Chapter 6A of Title 12 by Ga. L. 2008, p. 90, § 1-1/HB 1176, effective July 1, 2008.

Code Sections 36-22-5 through 36-22-7 were previously reserved and repealed by Ga. L. 2005, p. 175, § 2/HB 98, effective April 14, 2005, and were based on Code 1981, §§ 36-22-5 through 36-22-7, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 392, § 1.

——————————

CHAPTER 23

THROUGH 29

Reserved

——————————

PROVISIONS APPLICABLE TO MUNICIPAL CORPORATIONS ONLY

——————————

CHAPTER 30

GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec.

36-30-1. Meaning of terms "city," "town," "municipality," or "village."

36-30-2. Management and disposition of property.

36-30-3. Ordinances of a council not to bind succeeding councils; exceptions.

36-30-4. Eligibility of members of municipal councils or boards of aldermen for other municipal offices.

36-30-5. Inclusion of residency in annexed territory in computing period of residence necessary to qualify for office.

36-30-6. Voting upon questions by interested councilmembers.

36-30-7. Authorization and procedure for surrender of corporate charter.

36-30-7.1. Inactive municipalities.

36-30-8. Confinement of violators of ordinances.

36-30-9. Compensation of law enforcement officers.

36-30-10. Grant of right to obstruct public street prohibited.

36-30-11. Enclosure of lanes or alleys.

36-30-12. Closing streets adjacent to or through institutions of higher learning in municipal corporations having a population of 350,000 or more.

36-30-13. Special election to fill vacancies when all seats are vacant.

Annotations

Cross references. - Self authentication, § 24-9-902.

Jurisdiction and authority of municipalities as to public roads, § 32-4-90 et seq.

Procedure for abatement of nuisances in cities generally, § 41-2-5.

Prohibition against requiring municipal or county officers or employees to reside within boundaries of municipality or county, § 45-2-5.

Municipal Electric Authority of Georgia, § 46-3-110 et seq.

Ad valorem taxation of property by municipalities, § 48-5-350 et seq.

Law reviews. - For annual survey of local government law, see 35 Mercer L. Rev. 233 (1983). For annual survey article on local government law, see 50 Mercer L. Rev. 263 (1998).

36-30-1. Meaning of terms "city," "town," "municipality," or "village."

Statute text

Wherever the words "city," "town," "municipality," or "village" appear in the statutory laws of this state, such words shall be construed as synonymous, and the General Assembly so declares this to be its intention in the use of these words; such words shall be held to mean a municipal corporation as defined by statutory law and judicial interpretation.

History

(Ga. L. 1964, p. 170, § 1.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article, "Selected Oddities in Georgia Municipal Law," see 9 Ga. L. Rev. 783 (1975). For article, "Researching Georgia Law," see 34 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 741 (2015).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

This section is not unconstitutional for being a legislative restriction of the judiciary. Holloway v. Mayor of Whitesburg, 225 Ga. 152, 166 S.E.2d 576 (1969).
